New York, session 2025-2026, S7486.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 13 of chapter 405 of the laws of 2 2011, relating to authorizing the lease of lands located at the state 3 university of New York at Purchase, as amended by chapter 562 of the 4 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 5 (a) Any contracts or leases entered into by the state university of 6 New York with the Purchase college advancement corporation pursuant to 7 this act shall be subject to approval of the attorney general as to form 8 as well as by the director of the budget and the state comptroller. Any 9 and all proceeds relating to the leases authorized by this act shall be 10 allocated by the board of trustees for Purchase college, state universi- 11 ty of New York, in the following manner: seventy-five percent to the 12 student financial aid for New York state resident students who are 13 eligible to receive a federal Pell grant, or a tuition assistance award 14 or supplemental tuition assistance pursuant to section 667 or 667-a of 15 the education law, and twenty-five percent to support current and addi- 16 tional full-time faculty positions. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11614-02-5